Hawaii statutes.
§435E-18 Withdrawal of corpus.
Withdrawal of all, or any portion of, the corpus of the reserve trust fund
shall be upon the written authorization signed by at least two-thirds of the
members of the board of trustees. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next